Illinois, session 104th, HB3744.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Radiation Protection Act of 1990 is amended 5by changing Section 34 and by adding Section 50 as follows: 6    (420 ILCS 40/34)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 210-34)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027) 8    Sec. 34. Intrastate shippers of irradiated nuclear reactor 9fuel. 10    (a) All intrastate and interstate shippers carriers of 11irradiated nuclear reactor fuel in the State of Illinois are 12hereby required to notify the Agency no less than 7 days 24 13hours prior to any transportation of irradiated nuclear 14reactor fuel within this State of the proposed route, the 15place and time of entry into the State, and the amount and the 16source of the fuel. The Agency shall immediately notify the 17Illinois State Police, which shall notify the sheriff of those 18counties along the route of such shipment. 19    (b) As used in this Section: For the purpose of this 20subsection,21    a "carrier" is any entity charged with transportation of 22such irradiated reactor fuel from the nuclear steam-generating 23facility to a storage facility.   HB3744 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09466 BDA 19527 b1    "Irradiated For the purpose of this subsection, 2"irradiated reactor fuel" means fuel that has been withdrawn 3from a nuclear reactor following irradiation, the constituent 4elements of which have not been separated by reprocessing is 5any nuclear fuel assembly containing fissile-bearing material 6that has been irradiated in and removed from a nuclear reactor 7facility. 8    "Shipper" means the entity who offers the irradiated 9reactor fuel for transportation into commerce or the agent of 10an entity who offers the irradiated reactor fuel for 11transportation into commerce. 12(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 13    (420 ILCS 40/50 new)14    Sec. 50. Collection, storage, and disposal of radiation 15sources; fees. The Agency may collect, store, and dispose of 16uncontrolled sources of radiation that have entered the public 17domain and that the Agency considers to be a threat to public 18health and safety or the environment. The Agency may assess 19actual costs, as appropriate, for the collection, storage, and 20disposal of uncontrolled sources of radiation that have 21entered the public domain and that the Agency considers to be a 22threat to public health and safety or the environment against 23any person that owns, owned, possesses, or is responsible for 24the radioactive material entering the public domain.